Utah statutes.
39-4-4.   Governor may requisition arms and equipment from secretary of
defense.
For the use of such forces, the governor is authorized to requisition from the
secretary of war such arms and equipment as may be in possession of and can be
spared by the war department; and to make available to such forces the
facilities of state armories and their equipment and such other state premises
and property as may be available.
